Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.02
Alcoholic liquor, defined.

(1) Alcoholic liquor includes
alcohol, spirits, wine, beer, and any liquid or solid, patented or not, containing
alcohol, spirits, wine, or beer and capable of being consumed as a beverage
by a human being. Alcoholic liquor also includes confections or candy that
contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol.

(2) The Nebraska Liquor
Control Act does not apply to (a) alcohol used in the manufacture of denatured
alcohol produced in accordance with acts of Congress and regulations adopted
and promulgated pursuant to such acts, (b) flavoring extracts, syrups, medicinal,
mechanical, scientific, culinary, or toilet preparations, or food products
unfit for beverage purposes, but the act applies to alcoholic liquor used
in the manufacture, preparation, or compounding of such products or confections
or candy that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol, or (c) wine
intended for use and used by any church or religious organization for sacramental
purposes.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 10.